transliterator.lexd
PATTERNS
InitialGrapheme Grapheme*

LEXICON InitialGrapheme
a:а
a\::а̄
ã:аᴴ
e:э
e\::э̄
ẽ:эᴴ
i:и
i\:ӣ
ĩ:иᴴ
o:о
o\:о̄
õ:оᴴ
u:у
u\:ӯ
ũ:уᴴ
b:б
b̄:бб
c:ц
c̄:цц
c':цI
c̄':цIцI
č:ч
č̄:чч
č':чI
d:д
d̄:дд
g:г
h:гь
H:хI
H̄:хIхI
j:й
k:к
k̄:кк
k':кI
l:л
l̄:лл
ł:лъ
ł̄:лълъ
L:лI
L':кь
m:м
m̄:мм
n:н
n̄:нн
p:п
q:хъ
q':къ
r:р
r̄:рр
R:гъ
s:с
s̄:сс
š:ш
š̄:щ
t:т
t̄:тт
t':тI
w:в
x:х
x̄:хх
X:х
X̄:хх
y:'
z:з
ž:ж
ʕ:гI
ʔ:

LEXICON Grapheme
a:а
a\::а̄
ã:аᴴ
e:е
e\::е̄
ẽ:еᴴ
i:и
i\:ӣ
ĩ:иᴴ
o:о
o\:о̄
õ:оᴴ
u:у
u\:ӯ
ũ:уᴴ
b:б
b̄:бб
c:ц
c̄:цц
c':цI
c̄':цIцI
č:ч
č̄:чч
č':чI
d:д
d̄:дд
g:г
h:гь
H:хI
H̄:хIхI
j:й
k:к
k̄:кк
k':кI
l:л
l̄:лл
ł:лъ
ł̄:лълъ
L:лI
L':кь
m:м
m̄:мм
n:н
n̄:нн
p:п
q:хъ
q':къ
r:р
r̄:рр
R:гъ
s:с
s̄:сс
š:ш
š̄:щ
t:т
t̄:тт
t':тI
w:в
x:х
x̄:хх
X:х
X̄:хх
y:'
z:з
ž:ж
ʕ:гI
ʔ:
-:-
\=:\=
(:(
):)
.:
